Hawaii, session 2025, GM17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all
collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated
with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining
unit (6) :
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $6,618,392 $13,542,850
Federal funds $155,504 $338,322
Trust funds $38,695 $55,989
Revolving funds $48,200 $103,997
SECTION 2. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.

Page 2
.B. NO.
1032
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
PART II
SECTION 3. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary
increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who
are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same
compensation plans as those officers and employees within
bargaining unit ( 6) :
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds 882,679 1,905,632
Federal funds 11,111 24,172
Revolving funds 10,380 22,267
SECTION 4. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART III
SECTION 5. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund

Page 3 H.B. NO. 1032
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
G.D. 1
PROPOSED
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost
items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
representative of collective bargaining unit (6):
FY 2 0 2 5 -2 0 2 6 FY 2 0 2 6 -2 0 2 7
General funds 744,411 1,805,395
SECTION 6. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART IV
SECTION 7. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other
cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, for state officers and employees who are excluded from
collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans
as those officers and employees within bargaining unit (6)
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds 142,421 322,263
SECTION 8. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state

Page 4 H.B. NO. 1032
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART V
SECTION 9. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds.
SECTION 10. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, and June
30, 2027, of the respective fiscal years, shall lapse as of
those dates .
SECTION 11. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.

Page 5 H.B. NO. 1032
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D.1
PROPOSED